Utah statutes.
9-8-203.   Division duties.
(1)  The division shall:
(a)  stimulate research, study, and activity in the field of Utah history and
related history;
(b)  maintain a specialized history library;
(c)  mark and preserve historic sites, areas, and remains;
(d)  collect, preserve, and administer historical records relating to the
history of Utah;
(e)  administer, collect, preserve, document, interpret, develop, and exhibit
historical artifacts, documentary materials, and other objects relating to the
history of Utah for educational and cultural purposes;
(f)  edit and publish historical records;
(g)  cooperate with local, state, and federal agencies and schools and museums
to provide coordinated and organized activities for the collection,
documentation, preservation, interpretation, and exhibition of historical
artifacts related to the state;
(h)  provide grants and technical assistance as necessary and appropriate; and
(i)  comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, in its adjudicative proceedings.
(2)  The division may acquire or produce reproductions of historical artifacts
and documentary materials for educational and cultural use.
(3)  To promote an appreciation of Utah history and to increase heritage
tourism in the state, the division shall:
(a) (i)  create and maintain an inventory of all historic markers and
monuments that are accessible to the public throughout the state;
(ii)  enter into cooperative agreements with other groups and organizations to
collect and maintain the information needed for the inventory;
(iii)  encourage the use of volunteers to help collect the information and to
maintain the inventory;
(iv)  publicize the information in the inventory in a variety of forms and
media, especially to encourage Utah citizens and tourists to visit the markers
and monuments;
(v)  work with public and private landowners, heritage organizations, and
volunteer groups to help maintain, repair, and landscape around the markers
and monuments; and
(vi)  make the inventory available upon request to all other public and
private history and heritage organizations, tourism organizations and
businesses, and others;
(b) (i)  create and maintain an inventory of all active and inactive
cemeteries throughout the state;
(ii)  enter into cooperative agreements with local governments and other
groups and organizations to collect and maintain the information needed for
the inventory;
(iii)  encourage the use of volunteers to help collect the information and to
maintain the inventory;
(iv)  encourage cemetery owners to create and maintain geographic information
systems to record burial sites and encourage volunteers to do so for inactive
and small historic cemeteries;
(v)  publicize the information in the inventory in a variety of forms and
media, especially to encourage Utah citizens to participate in the care and
upkeep of historic cemeteries;
(vi)  work with public and private cemeteries, heritage organizations,
genealogical groups, and volunteer groups to help maintain, repair, and
landscape cemeteries, grave sites, and tombstones; and
(vii)  make the inventory available upon request to all other public and
private history and heritage organizations, tourism organizations and
businesses, and others; and
(c) (i)  create and maintain a computerized record of cemeteries and burial
locations in a state-coordinated and publicly accessible information system;
(ii)  gather information for the information system created and maintained
under Subsection (3)(c)(i) by providing matching grants, upon approval by the
board, to:
(A)  municipal cemeteries;
(B)  cemetery maintenance districts;
(C)  endowment care cemeteries;
(D)  private nonprofit cemeteries;
(E)  genealogical associations; and
(F)  other nonprofit groups with an interest in cemeteries; and
(iii)  adopt rules, pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, for granting matching funds under Subsection (3)(c)(ii) to
assure that:
(A)  professional standards are met; and
(B)  projects are cost effective.
(4) (a)  For a pass-through funding grant of at least $25,000, the division
shall make quarterly disbursements to the pass-through funding grant
recipient, contingent upon the division receiving a quarterly progress report
from the pass-through grant recipient.
(b)  The division shall:
(i)  provide the pass-through grant recipient with a progress report form for
the reporting purposes of Subsection (4)(a); and
(ii)  include reporting requirement instructions with the form.
(5)  This chapter may not be construed to authorize the division to acquire by
purchase any historical artifacts, documentary materials, or specimens that
are restricted from sale by federal law or the laws of any state, territory,
or foreign nation.
